Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.045

Delay or denial of adoption on basis of race, color, or national origin prohibited—Consideration in placement—Exception—Training.

(1) An adoption shall not be delayed or denied on the basis of the race, color, or national origin of the adoptive parent or the child involved. However, when the department or an agency considers whether a placement option is in a child's best interests, the department or agency may consider the cultural, ethnic, or racial background of the child and the capacity of prospective adoptive parents to meet the needs of a child of this background. This provision shall not apply to or affect the application of the Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.

(2) The department shall create standardized training to be provided to all department employees involved in the placement of a child to assure compliance with Title IV of the civil rights act of 1964 and the multiethnic placement act of 1994, as amended by the interethnic adoption provisions of the small business job protection act of 1996. Such training shall be open to agency employees.

[ 2006 c 248 s 1; 1995 c 270 s 8.]

NOTES:

Finding—1995 c 270: See note following RCW 74.13A.040.